New York, session 2025-2026, A1367.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. For the purposes of this act, "auxiliary police officer" 2 shall mean a member of an auxiliary police organization authorized by 3 local law. 4 § 2. (a) Any person serving or who has served as an auxiliary police 5 officer in an auxiliary police organization in a municipality, including 6 a city having a population of one million or more persons, that has 7 authorized the formation of an auxiliary police force providing for 8 voluntary participation by auxiliary police officers in a local law 9 enforcement agency shall be entitled to a retirement service identifica- 10 tion card as provided in this act. Such retirement service identifica- 11 tion card shall be issued by the entity that issues the identification 12 card carried by the auxiliary police officer during such officer's peri- 13 od of service. 14 (b) A retirement service identification card shall be issued to an 15 auxiliary police officer upon such officer's retirement from the auxil- 16 iary police force provided such officer: 17 (i) served as an auxiliary police officer in good standing for at 18 least ten years prior to retirement; or 19 (ii) retired as a result of an injury that occurred in the course of 20 the auxiliary police officer's duties for the law enforcement agency and 21 which rendered the auxiliary police officer permanently unable to 22 continue service as an auxiliary police officer. 23 (c) A retirement service card issued pursuant to this act shall state 24 the name of the retired auxiliary police officer, identify the holder of 25 the card as a retired auxiliary police officer for the appropriate local EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03945-01-5 A. 1367 2 1 law enforcement agency, and indicate the years the holder served as an 2 auxiliary police officer. The retirement service card shall also thank 3 the retired auxiliary police officer for the officer's service. 4 (d) The cost of a retirement service card issued pursuant to this act 5 shall be borne by the local law enforcement agency the auxiliary police 6 officer served with; provided that if the auxiliary police officer 7 served with two or more local law enforcement agencies, the cost of the 8 retirement service card shall be divided equally between or among the 9 local law enforcement agencies, unless otherwise agreed by the agencies. 10 § 3. Nothing in this act shall be construed to grant any pension bene- 11 fits, entitlement to pension benefits or enrollment in any pension plans 12 for retired auxiliary police officers. 13 § 4. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 14 have become a law.